Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB400.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The passenger pigeon was once an abundant native species of this Commonwealth.(2) The passenger pigeon contributed greatly to the early history of this Commonwealth, including through hunting for food and sport.(3) The legacy of passenger pigeons in this Commonwealth endures through numerous places named in their honor.(4) At one time, there may have been more passenger pigeons in North America than all other birds in the world combined.(5) The extinction of the passenger pigeon helped contribute to awareness and support for preservation of other 123456789101112131415161718 endangered species.Section 2. Official State extinct animal.The passenger pigeon (Ectopistes migratorius) is designated as the official extinct species of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0400PN0369 - 2 - 1234567